Alaska, session 34, HB44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 23.30.215(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) If the injury causes death, the compensation is known as a death benefit 06 and is payable in the following amounts to or for the benefit of the following persons: 07 (1) reasonable and necessary funeral expenses not exceeding $12,000; 08 (2) if there is a widow or widower or a child or children of the 09 deceased, the following percentages of the spendable weekly wages of the deceased: 10 (A) 80 percent for the widow or widower with no children; 11 (B) 50 percent for the widow or widower with one child and 40 12 percent for the child; 13 (C) 30 percent for the widow or widower with two or more 14 children and 70 percent divided equally among the children; 01 (D) 100 percent for an only child when there is no widow or 02 widower; 03 (E) 100 percent, divided equally, if there are two or more 04 children and no widow or widower; 05 (3) if the widow or widower remarries, the widow or widower is 06 entitled to be paid in one sum an amount equal to the compensation to which the 07 widow or widower would otherwise be entitled in the two years commencing on the 08 date of remarriage as full and final settlement of all sums due the widow or widower; 09 (4) if there is no widow or widower or child or children, then for the 10 support of father, mother, grandchildren, brothers, and sisters, if dependent on the 11 deceased at the time of injury, 42 percent of the spendable weekly wage of the 12 deceased to such beneficiaries, share and share alike, not to exceed $150,000 in the 13 aggregate; 14 (5) $8,000 to a surviving widow or widower, or equally divided among 15 surviving children of the deceased if there is no widow or widower; and 16 (6) if there is no widow or widower or child or children, and the 17 father, mother, grandchildren, brothers, and sisters were not dependent on the 18 deceased at the time of injury, the following amounts are payable in a lump sum: 19 (A) $120,000 to the surviving parent, if there is only one 20 surviving parent; 21 (B) $120,000 divided equally among the surviving parents, 22 if there are two or more surviving parents; or 23 (C) $120,000 to the estate of the decedent, if there are no 24 surviving parents. 25 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.